Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE I. WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 9025. TALLEY RANCH WATER CONTROL AND IMPROVEMENT

DISTRICT NO. 1 OF DENTON COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9025.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Talley Ranch Water Control and Improvement District No. 1 of Denton County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9025.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a water control and improvement district in Denton County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9025.003. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the following laws apply to the district:

(1) Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code; and

(2) Section 52(b)(3), Article III, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 9025.051. ROAD PROJECTS. (a) The district may construct, acquire, improve, maintain, or operate macadamized, graveled, or paved roads, or improvements in aid of those roads, inside the district.

(b) A road project must meet all applicable construction standards, zoning and subdivision requirements, and regulatory ordinances of the municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located.

(c) The district may not undertake a road project unless each municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located consents by ordinance or resolution.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 9025.052. COMPLIANCE WITH COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL ORDINANCES OR RESOLUTIONS RELATING TO ROAD PROJECTS. The district shall comply with all applicable requirements relating to projects authorized by Section 9025.051 of any ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing body of:

(1) a county in which the district is located for a project in the unincorporated area of the county; or

(2) a municipality in whose corporate limits or extraterritorial jurisdiction the district is located for a project in the corporate limits or the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the municipality.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. GENERAL FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 9025.101. TAX TO REPAY BONDS. The district may impose a tax to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued for a project under Section 9025.051.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. BONDS

Sec. 9025.151. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The district may issue bonds or other obligations as provided by Chapters 49 and 51, Water Code, to finance the construction, maintenance, or operation of projects under Section 9025.051.

(b) The district may not issue bonds authorized for a project under Section 9025.051 unless the issuance is approved by a vote of a two-thirds majority of the voters of the district voting at an election called for that purpose.

(c) Bonds or other obligations issued or incurred to finance projects authorized by Section 9025.051 may not exceed one-fourth of the assessed value of the real property in the district.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (H.B. 4101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.